Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202629-4904
County with population under one hundred thousand; prosecuting agency; duties.

(1) This section applies to any county with a population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants.

(2) A prosecuting agency shall provide an officer with written notice, including the proposed rationale, when determining whether the officer is subject to a prospective Brady-Giglio disclosure and shall also provide written notice of the prosecuting agency's final decision on such disclosure.

Laws 2026, LB965, § 25.
October 1, 2026